Nevada, session 83, SB291.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. Chapter 483 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall establish procedures by which a
licensee who is a victim of identity theft may request that the
number of his or her driver’s license be changed to a new unique
number.
2. As used in this section, “identity theft” means a violation
of the provisions of NRS 205.463, 205.464 or 205.465.
Sec. 13. NRS 483.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.020 As used in NRS 483.010 to 483.630, inclusive, and
section 12 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 483.030 to 483.190, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 14. NRS 483.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.410 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and
NRS 483.330 and 483.417, for every driver’s license, including a
motorcycle driver’s license, issued and service performed, the
following fees must be charged:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
An original or renewal license issued to a person
65 years of age or older ............................................ $13.50
An original or renewal license issued to any
person less than 65 years of age which
expires on the eighth anniversary of the
licensee’s birthday ...................................................... 37.00
An original or renewal license issued to any
person less than 65 years of age which
expires on or before the fourth anniversary of
the licensee’s birthday ................................................ 18.50
Administration of the examination required by
NRS 483.330 for a noncommercial driver’s
license ......................................................................... 25.00
Each readministration to the same person of the
examination required by NRS 483.330 for a
noncommercial driver’s license ................................. 10.00
Reinstatement of a license after suspension,
revocation or cancellation, except a
revocation for a violation of NRS 484C.110,
484C.120, 484C.130 or 484C.430, or
pursuant to NRS 484C.210 and 484C.220 ................. 75.00
Reinstatement of a license after revocation for a
violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120,
484C.130 or 484C.430, or pursuant to NRS
484C.210 and 484C.220 ........................................... 120.00
A new photograph, change of name, change of
other information, except address, or any
combination .................................................................. 5.00
A duplicate license .......................................................... 14.00
2. For every motorcycle endorsement to a driver’s license, a
fee of $5 must be charged.
3. If no other change is requested or required, the Department
shall not charge a fee to change the number of a driver’s license at
the request of a licensee who is a victim of identity theft pursuant
to section 12 of this act or to convert the number of a license from
the licensee’s social security number, or a number that was
formulated by using the licensee’s social security number as a basis
for the number, to a unique number that is not based on the
licensee’s social security number.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.417, the increase
in fees authorized by NRS 483.347 and the fees charged pursuant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
NRS 483.415 must be paid in addition to the fees charged pursuant
to subsections 1 and 2.
5. A penalty of $10 must be paid by each person renewing a
license after it has expired for a period of 30 days or more as
provided in NRS 483.386 unless the person is exempt pursuant to
that section.
6. The Department may not charge a fee for the reinstatement
of a driver’s license that has been:
(a) Voluntarily surrendered for medical reasons; or
(b) Cancelled pursuant to NRS 483.310.
7. All fees and penalties are payable to the Administrator at the
time a license or a renewal license is issued.
8. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.340, subsection 3
of NRS 483.3485, NRS 483.415 and 483.840, and subsection 3 of
NRS 483.863, all money collected by the Department pursuant to
this chapter must be deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the
Motor Vehicle Fund.
Secs. 15-17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2027.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)